Maine, session 132, LD1342.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to allow a person who registers a motor vehicle that subsequently
fails a state inspection to receive a prorated refund of registration fees and excise taxes,
within 90 days, or apply the remaining value as a credit toward the registration of another
vehicle.
Page 1 - 132LR2062(01)